Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202385-3203
Awards to eligible students.

The commission shall, as provided in the Door to College Scholarship Act, provide for awards to be made directly to eligible students beginning with the 2024-25 school year. An award shall not exceed a maximum of five thousand dollars annually to an eligible student with a full-time status and shall be prorated for eligible students with a part-time status. The commission may adjust the value of awards annually to make awards to all eligible applicants who apply by the application deadline set by the commission.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 30.
July 1, 2023